apertium-lin.lin.lexc
LEXICON Det-Var-Ind
%[%+sg%]%<det%>%<ind%>%<sp%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl1%]%<det%>%<ind%>%<sp%>%<cl1%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl5%]%<det%>%<ind%>%<sp%>%<cl5%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl6%]%<det%>%<ind%>%<sp%>%<cl6%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl7%]%<det%>%<ind%>%<sp%>%<cl7%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl8%]%<det%>%<ind%>%<sp%>%<cl8%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
!%[%+cl10%]%<det%>%<ind%>%<sp%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Det-Pos
%<det%>%<pos%>%<sp%>: COMMON-Suffix ;


!=============================================================================!
!                         Misc. Morphotactics                                 !
!=============================================================================!

LEXICON Quant-Suffix
%<det%>%<qnt%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Prep-Suffix
%<pr%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Conj-Coord-Suffix
%<cnjcoo%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Conj-Subord-Suffix
%<cnjsub%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Conn-Suffix
%<conn%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Neg-Suffix
%<neg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Adjective-Prefix
Adjective-Stems ;
%[%-sg%]:mo%> Adjective-Stems ; ! default singular
%[%-pl%]:mi%> Adjective-Stems ; ! defautl plural
%[%-cl1%]:mu%> Adjective-Stems ;
%[%-cl5%]:li%> Adjective-Stems ;
%[%-cl6%]:ma%> Adjective-Stems ;
%[%-cl7%]:e%> Adjective-Stems ;
%[%-cl8%]:bi%> Adjective-Stems ;
!%[%-pl%]%[%-cl10%]:ba%> Adjective-Stems ;

LEXICON Adjective-Var-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<adj%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%<adj%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl1%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl1%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl5%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl5%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl6%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl6%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl7%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl7%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl8%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl8%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
!%[%+pl%]%[%+cl10%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl10%>: COMMON-Suffix ;


LEXICON Adjective-InVar-Suffix
%<adj%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Adverb-Suffix
%<adv%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Numeral-Suffix
%<num%>%<ord%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%<num%>%<card%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Focus-Suffix
%<foc%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Interjection-Suffix
%<ij%>: COMMON-Suffix ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!=============================================================================!
!                               Nouns                                         !
!=============================================================================!

LEXICON Ia-II-Stems
anjelu:anjelu Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Angel"
léki:léki Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Younger sibling"
kelasi:kelasi Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "School"
kíti:kíti Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Chair, throne"
kóko:kóko Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Grandparent"
kómbo:kómbo Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Broom"
mama:mama Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Mom"
mbuta%-múntu:mbuta%-múntu Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Guard"
mbwá:mbwá Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Dog"
ndáko:ndáko Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "House"
ndeko:ndeko Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Sibling"
ndeko% mwasi:ndeko% mwasi Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Sister"
ngando:ngando Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Crocodile, transport controller"
nganga:nganga Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Expert, magician, healer"
nkísi:nkísi Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Amulet, medicine, drug"
nókó:nókó Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Uncle"
nsómí:nsómí Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Free person"
ntoma:ntoma Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Apostle"
nzói:nzói Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Bee"
profete:profete Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Prophet"
sángó:sángó Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Priest"
sodá:sodá Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Soldier"
tatá:tatá Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Dad"
zábolo:zábolo Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Demon"
sanduku:sanduku Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Box"
bugumési:bugumési Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Mayor"
sani:sani Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Plate"
moske:moske Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Mosque"
wɛnzɛ:wɛnzɛ Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Outdoor market"
mbísi:mbísi Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Fish"
gilípi:gilípi Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Flu"
kanton:kanton Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Province"
mumpɛ́:mumpɛ́ Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Catholic, catholicism"
ewutéli:ewutéli Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Origin"
ekélami:ekélami Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Creation"
ebénéli:ebénéli Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Functioning"

LEXICON VI-Only-Stems
mabélé:bélé V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Sand, earth"
mafúta:fúta V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Oil"
malási:lási V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Perfume"
máí:í V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Water"
máyí:yí V-VI-Suffix ; ! Dir/LR
makilá:kilá V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Blood"
mambénga:mbénga V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Equator"
masúwa:súwa V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Ship"
mayɛ́lɛ:yɛ́lɛ V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Intelligence"
mapɔnɔmi:pɔnɔmi V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Voting season"
manáka:náka V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Calendar"
mambí:mambí V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Study"

!!! Never takes n/m
LEXICON IX-X-a-Stems
balé:balé IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Ball"
batísimo:batísimo IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Baptism"
bozó:bozó IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Care"
búku:búku IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Book"
butú:butú IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Night"
bwátu:bwátu IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Dugout canoe, boat" (guessing this is class IX?)
fétí:fétí IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Party"
kemi:kemi IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Chemistry"
kosákosá:kosákosá IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Shrimp"
kurúze:kurúze IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Cross"
maládi:maládi IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Disease"
pálaki:pálaki IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Plate"
porte:porte IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Door"
sánzá:sánzá IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Moon, month"
sekelé:sekelé IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Secret"
séléká:séléká IX-X-Suffix ; ! "In truth"
simetiere:simetiere IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Cemetary" (unsure if acutally class IX)
sukáli:sukáli IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Sugar"
vile:vile IX-X-Suffix ; ! "City"
víno:víno IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Wine"
víno:vinu IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Wine" Dir/LR
zélo:zélo IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Sand"
ndɛkɛ:ndɛkɛ IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Bird"
zuluná:zuluná IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Newspaper"
komíni:komíni IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Communes"
sapáto:sapáto IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Shoe"
afabɛ́:afabɛ́ IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Alphabet"
dyosɛ́zi:dyosɛ́zi IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Diocese"
mángwɛlɛ́:mángwɛlɛ́ IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Vaccine"
zemi:zemi IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Pregnancy"
zándo:zándo IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Market"
kɔ́ngɔ:kɔ́ngɔ IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Congo"
klísto:klísto IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Christian"

!!! Can take n/m or not
LEXICON IX-X-b-Stems
!! Can take m or not
mpámba:pámba IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Nothing"
mpási:pási IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Suffering"
mpembéni:pembéni IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Close"
mpókwa:pókwa IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Twilight, evening"
mpongí:pongí IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Sleep"
mpósá:pósá IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Envy"
mpúnda:púnda IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Horse"
mbulamatari:bulamatari IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Government"
mpúku:púku IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Rat"

!! Can take n or not
nkándá:kándá IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Anger"
nkáké:káké IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Thunder"
nkímyá:kímyá IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Calm"
nkímyá:kimia IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Calm" Dir/LR
nkínga:kínga IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Bicycle"
nkómbó:kómbó IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Name"
nsangó:sangó IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Information"
nsima:sima IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Behind" (often followed by na for preposition-like usage)
nsé:sé IX-X-Suffix ; ! "The ground"
nsinga:singa IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Wire"
nsómo:sómo IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Terror"
nsóni:sóni IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Shame"
nsúka:súka IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Target, end"
ntálo:tálo IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Number"
ntángo:tángo IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Time"
ntóngó:tóngó IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Morning"
ntína:tína IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Reason, cause"
ntembe:tembe IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Doubt"
ntolí:tolí IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Advice"
ntólo:tólo IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Torso"
nzámba:zámba IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Forest"
nkíngó:kíngó IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Neck"
nkíngá:kíngá IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Bike"
ntángawisi:tángawisi IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Ginger"
nkóló:kóló IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Owner, Lord"
nkɔ́kɔ:kɔ́kɔ IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Ancestor"

LEXICON Adjective-Stems
mokɛ́:kɛ́ Adjective-Var-Suffix ; ! "Small"
mokúsé:kúsé Adjective-Var-Suffix ; ! "Short"
molaí:laí Adjective-Var-Suffix ; ! "Long"
molayi:layi Adjective-Var-Suffix ; ! "Tall, long"
molalanda:lalanda Adjective-Var-Suffix ; ! "Blind"
monɛ́nɛ:nɛ́nɛ Adjective-Var-Suffix ; ! "Big"
mobola:bola Adjective-Var-Suffix ; ! "Poor"
bánsɔ:bánsɔ Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "All"
bínsɔ:bínsɔ Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "All" Dir/RL
bobele:bobele Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Only"
bololo:bololo Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Bitter, sour"
ngáí:ngáí Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Sour"
mabé:mabé Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Bad"
makási:makási Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Strong, hard, difficult"
malámu:malámu Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Good"
mobésu:mobésu Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Raw"
mobimba:mobimba Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "All, whole"
mwá:mwá Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! Generally means "small," "some," etc.
mua:mua Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "some, small" DIR/LR
mwíndo:mwíndo Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Black, African"
ntéi:ntéi Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Middle, central"
pɛ́mbɛ́:pɛ́mbɛ́ Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "White"
pɛnɛ:pɛnɛ Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Close to"
seko:seko Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Eternal"
solo:solo Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "True"
mpembéni:mpembéni Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Close"
molungé:molungé Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Warm, hot"
esengo:esengo Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Happy"
mosíká:síká Adjective-Var-Suffix ; ! "Far"
mpío:mpío Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Cold"
molémbu:lémbu Adjective-Var-Suffix ; ! "Easy, weak"
moíndo:moíndo Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Black, dark"
langí% la% káwa:langí% la% káwa Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Brown"
noki:noki Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Quick"
yaya:yaya Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Elder"
súdi:súdi Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "South"
nordi:nordi Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "North"
ɛ́sita:ɛ́sita Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "East"
límbe:límbe Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Occidental"
bómoí:bómoí Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Alive"
soni:soni Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Ashamed"
nsomo:nsomo Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Awful"
loko:loko Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Deaf"
ngoi% ngoi:ngoi% ngoi Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Cowardly"
lifalansé:lifalansé Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "French"
lingɛlɛ́sa:lingɛlɛ́sa Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Lingala"
lialémani:lialémani Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "German"
ngɛngɛ:ngɛngɛ Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Poisonous"
ligreki:ligreki Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Greek"
liputrugɛ́shi:liputrugɛ́shi Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Portuguese"
bondɔbɔ́:bondɔbɔ́ Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Yellow"
mayɛ́lɛ:mayɛ́lɛ Adjective-InVar-Suffix ; ! "Intelligent, smart"
LEXICON Adverb
atá:atá Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Even"
atako:atako Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Even if"
áwa:áwa Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Here"
bandá:bandá Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Since"
boye:boye Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Like this"
buye:buye Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Like this"
ee:ee Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Yes"
tɛ́:tɛ́ Adverb-Suffix ; ! "No"
elɔngɔ́:elɔngɔ́ Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Together"
iyo:iyo Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Yes"
káka:káka Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Only, still"
se:se Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Still"
kala:kala Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Once upon a time"
kuna:kuna Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Over there"
wâná:wâná Adverb-Suffix ; ! "There"
kútu:kútu Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Rather, moreover"
lɛlɔ́:lɛlɔ́ Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Today"
lolo:lolo Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Today" (Infrequently used)
lisúsu:lisúsu Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Again"
mpenzá:mpenzá Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Really"
neti:neti Adverb-Suffix ; ! "As if"
kasi:kasi Adverb-Suffix ; ! "However"
nzoka% nde:nzoka% nde Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Yet, however"
penepene:penepene Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Very close"
sik'oyo:sik'oyo Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Now, immediately"
tangó:tangó Adverb-Suffix ; ! "When?"
na% nsima:na% nsima Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Behind"
na% nsé:na% nsé Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Under"
mpé:mpé Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Also"
mikɔlɔ% minso:mikɔlɔ% minso Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Always"
mikɔlɔ% nyɔ́nsɔ:mikɔlɔ% nyɔ́nsɔ Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Everyday"
bisíká% binso:bisíká% binso Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Everywhere"
yambo:yambo Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Before"
bobele:bobele Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Only, permanently"
míngi:míngi Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Too, very"
kalakala:kalakala Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Also, already"
ntóngó% nyɔ́nsɔ:ntóngó% nyɔ́nsɔ Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Daily"
mbala% mókó:mbala% mókó Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Once"
nye:nye Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Quite"
ndé:ndé Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Therefore"
mbala% míbalé:mbala% míbalé Adverb-Suffix ; ! "Twice"
ndenge% nini:ndenge% nini Adverb-Suffix ; ! "How?"
nzinga% nzinga:nzinga% nzinga Prep-Suffix ; ! Dir/LR
nzinganzinga:nzinganzinga Adverb-Suffix ; ! Dir/LR
